Colorado, session 2025B, HB25B-1011.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 12-30-126 as
follows:
12-30-126. Health-care providers - scope of practice -
preventive health care. (1) A LICENSED HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER,
INCLUDING A PHARMACIST LICENSED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 280 OF THIS
TITLE 12, A DENTAL HYGIENIST LICENSED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 220 OF
THIS TITLE 12, AND A REGISTERED NURSE LICENSED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE
255 OF THIS TITLE 12, MAY PROVIDE SPECIFIC, LOW-LEVEL PREVENTIVE
HEALTH-CARE SERVICES IF THE PREVENTIVE HEALTH-CARE SERVICES ARE
WITHIN THEIR EXISTING SCOPE OF PRACTICE AND TRAINING. THE
PREVENTIVE HEALTH-CARE SERVICES MAY INCLUDE:
(a) ADMINISTERING VACCINES APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL
CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION;
(b) CONDUCTING ROUTINE HEALTH SCREENINGS, INCLUDING
BLOOD PRESSURE MEASUREMENT, DIABETES RISK ASSESSMENTS, AND
CHOLESTEROL CHECKS; AND
(c) PROVIDING PATIENT EDUCATION AND COUNSELING RELATED TO
PREVENTIVE HEALTH-CARE MEASURES.
(2) THE AUTHORITY GRANTED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION:
(a) APPLIES TO PREVENTIVE HEALTH-CARE SERVICES PROVIDED TO
ALL PATIENTS; AND
(b) IS INTENDED TO EXPAND ACCESS TO PREVENTIVE HEALTH-CARE
SERVICES FOR MEDICAID RECIPIENTS AND LOW-INCOME INDIVIDUALS.
(3) THIS SECTION SHALL NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(a) EXPAND A SCOPE OF PRACTICE BEYOND WHAT IS PERMITTED BY
PROFESSIONAL LICENSURE LAWS SET FORTH IN ARTICLES 200 TO 310 OF
-2- HB25B-1011

THIS TITLE 12; OR
(b) REQUIRE ADDITIONAL LICENSURE.
(4) FOR STATE FISCAL YEAR 2026-27, AND EACH STATE FISCAL
YEAR THEREAFTER, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL NOT APPROPRIATE
MONEY TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, AND THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL PERFORM ANY DUTIES REQUIRED PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION WITHIN EXISTING RESOURCES.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-3- HB25B-1011